Illinois, session 104th, SB360.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Court Reporters Act is amended by changing 5Section 2 as follows: 6    (705 ILCS 70/2)  (from Ch. 37, par. 652)7    Sec. 2. This Act shall be known and and may be cited as the 8Court Reporters Act.9(Source: Laws 1965, p. 2616.)